backup/apertium-mal-eng.mal.dix
  <!-- മാങ്ങ; മാങ്ങ; 16 -->
<pardef n="മാങ്ങ__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/><par n="clitics_ode"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യെ</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യുടെ</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യ്ക്</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യില്‍</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യാല്‍</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യേ</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യോട്</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കള്‍</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളെ</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളുടെ</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കള്‍കൂ</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളില്‍</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളാല്‍</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളേ</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളോടു</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="തണുപ്പ/്__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_aayirunnu"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്</l>         <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിനെ</l>       <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിന്റെ</l>     <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിന്</l>       <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ില്‍</l>      <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ാല്‍</l>      <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>േ</l>         <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിനൊട്</l>     <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="വീട/്__n">
  <e>       <p><l>്</l>         <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്ടില</l>         <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_lekk"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിനെ</l>       <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിന്റെ</l>     <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിന്</l>       <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്ടില്‍</l>    <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>്ടി</l>       <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ാല്‍</l>      <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>െ</l>         <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിനൊട്</l>     <r>്<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="പട്ടി__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_u"/><par n="clitics_o"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_yodappam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യെ</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യുടെ</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ക്ക്</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യാല്‍</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യേ</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യോട്</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കള്‍</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളെ</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളുടെ</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കള്‍ക്</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളാല്‍</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളേ</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളോട്</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="അമ്മ__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_nam"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യെ</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യുടെ</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ക്ക്</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യാല്‍</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യേ</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>യോട്</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കള്‍</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളെ</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളുടെ</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കള്‍ക്ക്</l>  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളാല്‍</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളേ</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കളോട്</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ജന/ല്‍__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ല്‍</l>       <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലി</l>        <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="clitics_loode"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലിനെ</l>      <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലിന്റെ</l>    <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലിന്</l>      <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലാല്‍</l>     <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലേ</l>        <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലിനോട്</l>    <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലുകള്‍</l>    <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലുകലുളെ</l>   <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലുകളുടെ</l>   <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കലുള്‍ക്</l>  <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കലുളാല്‍</l>  <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>കലുളേ</l>     <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ലുകളോട്</l>   <r>ല്‍<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ഇത/്__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>്</l>         <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിനെ</l>       <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിന്റെ</l>     <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിന്</l>       <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ില്‍</l>      <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ാല്‍</l>      <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>േ</l>         <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ിനൊട്</l>     <r>്<s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="soc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ഒരു__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="അമ്മ">            <i>അമ്മ</i><par n="അമ്മ__n"/></e>
<e lm="കത്ത">            <i>കത്ത്</i><par n="തണുപ്പ/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="കസേര">            <i>കസേര</i><par n="അമ്മ__n"/></e>
<e lm="കാലാവസ്ഥ">        <i>കാലാവസ്ഥ</i><par n="അമ്മ__n"/></e>
<e lm="കുട്ടി">          <i>കുട്ടി</i><par n="പട്ടി__n"/></e>
<e lm="ജനല്‍">           <i>ജന</i><par n="ജന/ല്‍__n"/></e>
<e lm="തണുപ്പ്">         <i>തണുപ്പ</i><par n="തണുപ്പ/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="തല">              <i>തല</i><par n="പട്ടി__n"/></e>
<e lm="പക്ഷി">           <i>പക്ഷി</i><par n="പട്ടി__n"/></e>
<e lm="പട്ടി">           <i>പട്ടി</i><par n="പട്ടി__n"/></e>
<e lm="പൂച്ച">           <i>പൂച്ച</i><par n="പട്ടി__n"/></e>
<e lm=" പേന">            <i>പേന</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
<e lm="പേര">             <i>പേര്</i><par n="തണുപ്പ/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="പ്രൊജെക്റ്റ">     <i>പ്രൊജെക്റ്റ്</i><par n="തണുപ്പ/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="മാങ്ങ">           <i>മാങ്ങ</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
<e lm="മേശ">             <i>മേശ</i><par n="അമ്മ__n"/></e>
<e lm="രേഖ">             <i>രേഖ</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
<e lm="വയസ്സ്">          <i>വയസ്സ</i><par n="തണുപ്പ/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="വീട്">            <i>വീട</i><par n="വീട/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="ഇത്">             <i>ഇത</i><par n="ഇത/്__prn"/></e>
 <e lm="വീട്">            <i>വീട</i><par n="തണുപ്പ/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="‌ഒരു">            <i>ഒരു</i><par n="ഒരു__det"/></e>
<e lm="കണ്ണ്">           <i>കണ്ണ</i><par n="തണുപ്പ/്__n"/></e>
<e lm="കളി">             <i>കളി</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
<e lm="മറുപടി">          <i>മറുപടി</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
<e lm="ശ്രദ്ധ">          <i>ശ്രദ്ധ</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
<e lm="മറുപടി">          <i>മറുപടി</i><par n="മാങ്ങ__n"/></e>
